zh-TW: 媒體 > 雜誌/報紙: 雜誌; 報紙
pt-PT: Multimédia > Revistas e jornais: Revistas; Jornais
fi: Media > Aikakaus- ja sanomalehdet: Aikakauslehdet; Sanomalehdet
vi: Truyền thông > Tạp chí và báo: Tạp chí; Báo
lt-LT: Medija > Žurnalai ir laikraščiai: Žurnalai; Laikraščiai
pl: Media > Gazety i czasopisma: Czasopisma; Gazety
hu: Média > Magazinok és újságok: Magazinok; Újságok
pt-BR: Mídia > Revistas e jornais: Revistas; Jornais
el: Μέσα ενημέρωσης > Περιοδικά & εφημερίδες: Περιοδικά; Εφημερίδες
bg-BG: Медия > Списания и вестници: Списания; Вестници
ja: メディア > 新聞・雑誌: 雑誌; 新聞
tr: Medya > Dergiler ve Gazeteler: Dergiler; Gazeteler
nb: Medier > Magasiner og aviser: Magasiner; Aviser
da: Medier > Magasiner og aviser: Magasiner; Aviser
cs: Média > Noviny a časopisy: Časopisy; Noviny
it: Media > Riviste e giornali: Riviste; Giornali
sk-SK: Médiá > Časopisy a noviny: Časopisy; Noviny
th: สื่อ > นิตยสารและหนังสือพิมพ์: นิตยสาร; หนังสือพิมพ์
ro-RO: Media > Reviste și ziare: Reviste; Ziare
es: Multimedia > Revistas y periódicos: Revistas; Periódicos
sl-SI: Mediji > Revije in časopisi: Revije; Časopisi
sv: Media > Tidningar och tidskrifter: Tidskrifter; Tidningar
nl: Media > Tijdschriften en kranten: Tijdschriften; Kranten
de: Medien > Zeitschriften & Zeitungen: Zeitschriften; Zeitungen
zh-CN: 媒体 > 报纸/杂志: 杂志; 报纸
en: Media > Magazines & Newspapers: Magazines; Newspapers
ru: Медиаконтент > Журналы и газеты: Журналы; Газеты
fr: Médias > Magazines et journaux: Magazines; Journaux
ko: 미디어 > 잡지/신문: 잡지; 신문
hr-HR: Mediji > Časopisi i novine: Časopisi; Novine